src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-s20_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Verb - leggja: # 
    leggja+V+Inf: leggja
    leggja+V+Inf: leggja
    leggja+V+Ind+Prs+3Sg: leggur
    leggja+V+Ind+Prt+3Sg: legði
    leggja+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: løgdu
    leggja+V+Sup: lagt
    leggja+V+PrfPtc+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: lagdur
    leggja+V+Inf: leggja
